Oklahoma, session 2026, SB887.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 569 of Title 57, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Department of Corrections shall establish a five-year


pilot program, subject to the availability of funds, called the


“Secure Pre-Integration Pilot Program”. The purpose of the pilot


program is to provide re-integration assistance to offenders


incarcerated for non-violent offenses in order to reduce prison


populations and the associated cost to this state.

Req. No. 1580 Page 1


B. The Secure Pre-Integration Pilot Program shall address a


comprehensive plan for release of an inmate to his or her family or


community entity, including a church or non-profit organization.


The family or community entity responsible for such released inmate


shall monitor the person and make regular reports to the Department


of Corrections.


C. The Secure Pre-Integration Pilot Program shall be


administered by the Department of Corrections. The Department shall


promulgate rules to administer the provisions of this section.


D. This section shall not be construed to decrease sentence


time or serve as a mechanism for probation or parole. Inmates


released pursuant to the provisions of this section are considered


to be in the custody of the responsible party as determined by the


Department of Corrections.


E. Inmates transferred to the custody of the Department of


Corrections from another state pursuant to the Interstate


Corrections Compact (ICC), or any similar agreement, are eligible to


participate in the Secure Pre-Integration Pilot Program.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 569.1A of Title 57, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Department of Corrections to be designated the “Secure Pre-


Integration Pilot Program Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a

Req. No. 1580 Page 2


continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall


consist of all monies received by the Department of Corrections from


appropriations, donations, grants, or other sources of funding


provided for the purpose of administering the Secure Pre-Integration


Pilot Program. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are


hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the


Department of Corrections for the purpose provided for in Section 1


of this act. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants


issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by


law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services for approval and payment. Of the available funds, the


Department may use up to five percent (5%) to cover administrative


costs.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1580 CN 1/19/2025 5:45:17 AM

















Req. No. 1580 Page 3